Washington statutes.
RCW 21.30.320

Records.

(1) A licensed commodity broker-dealer or commodity sales representative shall make and maintain records that the administrator determines, by rule, are necessary or appropriate.

(2) Required records may be maintained in computer or microform format or any other form of data storage provided that the records are readily accessible to the administrator.

(3) Required records must be preserved for five years unless the administrator, by rule, specifies either a longer or shorter period for a particular type or class of records.

[ 1986 c 14 s 33.]